Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2401.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-2-21 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-2 entitled "General
Powers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-2-21. City of Cranston — Municipal court City of Cranston -- Municipal court --
Housing division.
(a) Establishment. The city council of the city of Cranston may establish a municipal court
and confer upon the court original jurisdiction notwithstanding any other provisions of the general
laws to hear and determine causes the involving violation of any ordinance of the city including all
minimum housing violations of the city; provided, that any defendant found guilty of any offense
excluding minimum housing violations within the jurisdiction thereof by the court, may, within
five (5) days of the conviction, file an appeal from the conviction to the superior court and be
entitled in the latter court to a trial de novo; provided, that any defendant found guilty of any
minimum housing violation may, within five (5) days of the conviction, file an appeal from the
conviction to the district court and be entitled in the latter court to a trial de novo in accordance
with §§ 8-8-3(a)(2), 8-8-3.1, and 8-8-3.2. The city council of the city of Cranston may also establish
a municipal housing division (hereinafter, "housing division") within the municipal court in
accordance with subsection (e) of this section.
(b) Judges, clerks and procedures. The city council of the city of Cranston is authorized
and empowered to appoint a judge of the municipal court and a clerk of the municipal court. The
city council of the city of Cranston is also authorized to appoint a judge and clerk of the housing

division, who may be, but is not required to be, the same person(s) holding the judgeship and
clerkship of the municipal court. The city council of the city of Cranston is authorized and
empowered to enact ordinances governing the operation and procedure to be followed in the court
and the housing division and to establish a schedule of fees and costs.
(c) Operation, management, and powers of the municipal court. The municipal court may
impose a sentence not to exceed thirty (30) days in jail and impose a fine not in excess of five
hundred dollars ($500), or both. The court is empowered to administer oaths, compel the attendance
of witnesses, and punish persons for contempt. The housing division shall not have the power to
impose any jail sentence.
(d) Operation, management, and powers of the housing division. The Cranston city council
is authorized and empowered to enact ordinances governing the personnel, operation, and
procedure to be followed in the housing division, and to establish a schedule of fees and costs, and
to otherwise provide for the operation and management of the housing division. The Cranston city
council may authorize the housing division to impose fines not in excess of five hundred dollars
($500). The housing division may also be empowered to:
(1) Administer oaths;
(2) Compel the attendance of witnesses; and
(3) Punish persons for contempt.
(e) Municipal housing division establishment and jurisdiction.
(1) The city council of the city of Cranston may establish a housing division within the
municipal court, and confer upon the housing division original jurisdiction, notwithstanding any
other provisions of the general laws, to hear and determine causes involving the violation of the
zoning ordinances of the city and any violation of the provisions of chapter 24 of this title (“zoning
ordinances”); any violation of chapter 24.1 of this title (“historical area zoning act”); any violation
of chapter 24.2 of this title (“minimum housing standards”); any violation of chapter 24.3 of this
title (“housing maintenance and occupancy code”); any violation of chapter 23 of this title
(“subdivision of land”); any violation of any local Cranston ordinance or regulation, enacted
pursuant to these chapters; and any violation of the provisions of chapter 27.3 of title 23 (“state
building code”); and any violation of the provisions of those regulations promulgated by the state
building code commission entitled SBC-I Rhode Island state building code; SBC-2 Rhode Island
state one- and two-family (2) dwelling code; SBC-3 Rhode Island state plumbing code; SBC-4
Rhode Island state mechanical code; SBC-5 Rhode Island state electrical code; SBC-6 state
property maintenance code; SBC-8 Rhode Island state energy conservation code; and SBC-20
Rhode Island state fuel and gas code; and provided, further, that any party aggrieved by a final
LC004296/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

judgement, decree, or order of the Cranston housing division may, within twenty (20) days after
entry of this judgment, decree, or order, file an appeal to the superior court and be entitled in the
latter court to a trial de novo.
(2) With respect to violations falling under the jurisdiction of the Cranston housing
division, as outlined in subsection (e)(1) of this section, the city council may also confer upon the
housing division, in furtherance of the court’s jurisdiction, the power to proceed according to
equity:
(i) To restrain, prevent, enjoin, abate, or correct a violation;
(ii) To order the repair, vacation, or demolition of any dwelling existing in violation;
(iii) To otherwise compel compliance with all of the provisions of the ordinances and
statutes; and
(iv) To order a dwelling into receivership and to order the removal of any cloud on the title
to the building or property that shall be binding upon all those claiming by, through, under; or by
virtue of any inferior liens or encumbrances pursuant to chapter 44 of title 34.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004296/SUB A
========
LC004296/SUB A - Page 3 of 4